New York, session 2025-2026, S4975.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 15 of section 1209 of the public authorities 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) Subdivision one of section twenty-eight hundred seventy-nine-a of 4 this chapter shall only apply to authority contracts with an estimated 5 value greater than one million five hundred thousand dollars. 6 § 2. Subdivision 10 of section 1265-a of the public authorities law is 7 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 8 (c) Subdivision one of section twenty-eight hundred seventy-nine-a of 9 this chapter shall only apply to authority contracts with an estimated 10 value greater than one million five hundred thousand dollars. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06022-01-5